Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1841
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1801 to 81-1842 shall be known and may be cited
as the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 41;

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 17.